North Carolina, session 2025, SB1062.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The North Carolina Department of Transportation (Department) shall
study the cost and potential economic benefits of a commuter rail service linking dense
population centers in the North Carolina Piedmont Triad, and shall include the cities of
Winston-Salem, High Point, and Greensboro and encompass the counties of Forsyth and
Guilford. The study shall also evaluate additional transportation options beyond rail and shall
incorporate population and development growth projections through the year 2050. The study
shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:
(1) Governance & Implementation Structure.
a. Evaluate the feasibility of establishing a regional transit authority to
coordinate transportation across the Triad.
b. Consider an authority that would integrate both rail and bus
systems into a single, connected network.
c. Include a review of the potential governance structure and
representation across participating counties.
(2) Mode Flexibility.
a. Evaluate additional transportation options beyond commuter rail,
including.
1. Bus rapid transit (BRT).
2. Regional bus systems.
3. Roadway expansion and congestion mitigation projects.
b. Direct the Department to determine the most effective mix of
modes based on cost, ridership, and feasibility.
(3) Funding and Financing.
a. Include analysis of funding options across all modes, including local,
State, and federal sources.
b. Evaluate potential regional funding mechanisms and cost-sharing
approaches.
(4) Economic and Land Use Considerations
a. Include study of land and right-of-way needs for roadway expansion
and bus infrastructure.
b. Provide cost estimates for acquiring necessary property and access
rights across all modes.
*S1062-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. No later than December 29, 2026, the Department shall report to the
House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Transportation, Senate Appropriations
Committee on the Department of Transportation, Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight
Committee (JLTOC), and the Fiscal Research Division on the results of the study and any
recommendations for implementation.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used by the Department for this study.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and expires on December 29,
2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1062-First Edition